Illinois, session 104th, SB2628.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $5,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the LEARN 9 Campus Waukegan for facility 7renovation. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92025.